Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4296.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 349A.05, is amended to read: 349A.05 RULES. The director may adopt rules under chapter 14 governing the following elements of the lottery: (1) the number and types of lottery retailers' locations; (2) qualifications of lottery retailers and application procedures for lottery retailer contracts; (3) investigation of lottery retailer applicants; (4) appeal procedures for denial, suspension, or cancellation of lottery retailer contracts; (5) compensation of lottery retailersnew text begin consistent with section 349A.17new text end ; (6) accounting for and deposit of lottery revenues by lottery retailers; (7) procedures for issuing lottery procurement contracts and for the investigation of bidders on those contracts; (8) payment of prizes; (9) procedures needed to ensure the integrity and security of the lottery; and (10) other rules the director considers necessary for the efficient operation and administration of the lottery. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [349A.17] LOTTERY RETAILER COMMISSIONS. new text end new text begin (a) The director of the State Lottery must pay a lottery retailer at least the following amounts: new text end new text begin (1) seven percent of the price of a ticket sold by the retailer for a lottery game for which the winner is determined by a drawing; new text end new text begin (2) 6.5 percent of the price of a ticket sold by the retailer for a lottery game in which the winner is determined without a drawing; and new text end new text begin (3) 2.5 percent of the amount of a winning ticket cashed by the retailer. new text end new text begin (b) The director of the State Lottery must increase the percentages given in paragraph (a), or a higher amount set by the director under paragraph (c), annually, effective July 1. The increase must be the amount of the percentage in paragraph (a), in the version of statutes for the year preceding the year in which the determination is made, multiplied by the Consumer Price Index from December of the year preceding the year in which the determination is made. This calculated increase must be added to the percentage in paragraph (a) to set the lottery retailer commission. The Consumer Price Index used must be the revised Consumer Price Index for all urban consumers for the St. Paul-Minneapolis metropolitan area as determined by the United States Department of Labor. new text end new text begin (c) The director of the State Lottery may adopt rules for retailer compensation or commission that exceeds the amounts specified in this section. The director of the State Lottery must periodically review lottery ticket sales and make adjustments to lottery retailer commission rates, consistent with this section, as deemed necessary to maintain appropriate return to the state. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026, and applies to tickets sold on or after that date. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin RULE CHANGE; TRANSITION.new text end new text begin (a) The director of the State Lottery must amend Minnesota Rules, part 7856.4030, so that the director compensates retailers consistent with Minnesota Statutes, section 349A.17. new text end new text begin (b) For tickets sold before August 1, 2026, the director of the State Lottery must compensate lottery retailers as provided by law or rule in effect on the date the ticket was sold. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin REVISOR INSTRUCTION.new text end new text begin The director of the State Lottery must notify the revisor of statutes of annual increases under Minnesota Statutes, section 349A.17, paragraph (b). The revisor of statutes must annually update the percentages in Minnesota Statutes, section 349A.17, paragraph (a), to reflect the increases made by the director of the State Lottery under Minnesota Statutes, section 349A.17, paragraph (b). new text end Sec. 5. new text begin REPEALER.new text end new text begin Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 349A.16, new text end new text begin is repealed. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2026. new text end APPENDIX Repealed Minnesota Statutes: 26-06790 349A.16 LOTTERY RETAILER COMMISSIONS. The director of the State Lottery shall: (1) increase commissions paid to lottery retailers in effect on January 1, 1998, by one-half percent on the price of each ticket sold by each retailer; and (2) provide that each lottery retailer receive a commission of at least one percent on the amount of each winning ticket cashed by that retailer. The director of the State Lottery shall periodically review lottery ticket sales and make such adjustments to lottery retailer commission rates as are deemed necessary to maintain appropriate return to the state.